California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 592.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52881.

The board may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the board to advise the board in carrying out this chapter. The board may retain outside counsel, with the approval of the Attorney General, when a possibility of conflict exists between the board and the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52882.

The board shall meet at least once a year, or at the call of the chairperson or the secretary, or at the request of any six voting members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52883.

A quorum of the board shall be any six voting members or their alternates. The vote of a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52884.

The secretary or the secretary’s representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52885.

No board member, alternate, member of a committee who is a nonmember of the board, or ex officio member shall receive a salary, but may, if approved by the board, be allowed per diem in accordance with Department of Human Resources rules for each day spent in actual attendance on, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the board or committees of the board, or on special assignment for the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 26.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52886.

Upon board action, all moneys received by any person from the assessments levied under the authority of Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 52951) of this chapter shall be deposited in banks designated by the board and shall be disbursed by order of the board through the agent or agents it designates for that purpose. Any designated agent shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in California, in favor of the board, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the agent’s duties and the strict accounting of all funds of the board, in the amount determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52887.

The state shall not be liable for the acts of the board or its contracts. Payment of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the board shall be limited to the funds collected under this chapter. No member of the board or alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, shall be personally liable on the contracts of the board nor shall a board member, alternate member, or employee of the board be responsible individually or jointly in any way to any cotton grower or handler or any other person for error in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of the board or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No board member or alternate member shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any member of the board. The liability of the board members shall be several and not joint, and no board members shall be liable for the default of any other board member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52889.

The secretary may require the board to correct or cease any activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter. If the board refuses or fails to cease those activities or functions or to make such corrections as required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities of the board until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the secretary have been accomplished.

Written notice to cease any activity that is the subject of a contract entered into by the board prior to the notice, shall not be effective until after the period of notice for termination provided in the contract or 120 days, whichever is shorter. Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall give written notification to the board of the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52890.

Either the secretary or the board may bring an action for judicial relief in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may thereafter issue a temporary restraining order, a permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Duties and Powers of the Board [52891. - 52893.]

52891.

The powers and duties of the board shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Establish a separate Acala and Pima quality standard. When determining each standard, the board shall consider fiber length, strength, uniformity, micronaire, seed quality, productivity, resistance to disease, including verticillium wilt, and spinning characteristics.

(b) Annually review test data and approve for release and planting within the district, cotton varieties that meet the existing Acala or Pima quality standard but are superior in some meaningful respect, as determined by the board, and that have qualities generally recognized by the cotton industry to be essential factors in producing that cotton within the district, or significant area within the district. 

(c) Conduct or commission tests for cotton production and quality evaluation in accordance with procedures to be adopted pursuant to Section 52902, and assess fees necessary for administering those tests.

(d) Conduct periodic referendums, as specified in this chapter, regarding the continuation of the district. A referendum shall also be conducted whenever the board proposes substantive changes in the Acala or Pima quality standard.

(e) Require all cotton varieties approved for release for planting, and produced in the district, to contain the word “Acala” or “Pima” in labeling and all lint to be marketed as “SJV Acala” or “SJV Pima.”

(f) Recommend to the secretary on all matters pertaining to this chapter including, but not limited to, the program for enforcing this chapter and the setting of an appropriate seed assessment rate necessary for the administration of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52891.1.

(a) The board may, by resolution, take actions that are in the best interest of the cotton industry in the district, which shall include, but not be limited to, the growing of cottons other than Acala and Pima. The resolution may contain provisions to protect the quality and integrity of approved fiber and seed grown within the district.

(b) The resolution shall be subject to a referendum conducted by the secretary, upon the request of the board, using information supplied by the board and other information as determined by the secretary, or a referendum shall be conducted by the secretary if a petition signed by not less than 5 percent of the qualified cotton growers in the district is presented to the board. The costs of
 any referendum conducted pursuant to this chapter shall be paid from funds collected pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The secretary shall find the resolution approved if either of the following conditions is met:

(1) Not less than 65 percent of the cotton growers certified by the secretary who voted in the referendum, voted in favor, and that those cotton growers so voting represent at least a majority of the cotton producing acreage of all cotton growers who voted in the referendum.

(2) At least a majority of those cotton growers who voted in the referendum voted in favor and that those cotton growers so voting represent not less than 65 percent of the cotton producing acreage of all cotton growers who voted in the referendum. The secretary shall then so certify to the board, which shall then make the approved
 resolution effective as an order of the board within 10 days after the certification by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 77.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52892.

Upon implementation of Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 52951), the powers and duties of the board shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) To adopt, and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend, all proper and necessary rules, regulations, and orders for carrying out the provisions of this chapter and for exercising its powers and the performance of its duties, including rules for regulation of appeals from any rule, regulation, or order of the board.

(b) To administer and enforce this chapter, and to do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to or in connection with or deemed reasonably necessary, proper, or advisable to
 effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(c) To employ a manager to serve, at the pleasure of the board, as president and chief executive officer of the board and other personnel, including legal counsel, that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(d) To establish offices and incur expense, and to enter into any and all contracts and agreements, and to create such liabilities and borrow such funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary, in the opinion of the board, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(e) To promote the sale of cotton by advertising and other promotional means for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for
 cotton.

(f) To enter into cost-sharing advertising with other products considered, by the board, to be fair and equitable to both parties.

(g) In the discretion of the board, to make, in the name of the board, contracts to render service in formulating and conducting plans and programs, and other contracts or agreements deemed necessary for the promotion of the sale of cotton.

(h) In the discretion of the board, to conduct, and contract with others to conduct, scientific research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained from that research or elsewhere regarding the marketing and production of cotton. In connection with that research, the board shall have the power to accept contributions of, or to match, private, state, or federal funds that may be available for those
 purposes, and to employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies conducting that research.

(i) In the discretion of the board, to publish and distribute, without charge, a bulletin or other communication for dissemination of information relating to the cotton industry to growers and other industry members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 78.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52893.

The board may require that all cottonseed delinted for planting within the district be certified by a qualified seed certification agency as provided by subdivision (d) of Section 52482.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Nonapproved Variety Research [52901. - 52903.]

52901.

The planting, possessing for planting, growing, picking, harvesting, ginning of cotton, delinting of cottonseed, or sale of lint by anyone conducting research on nonapproved varieties shall be in compliance with regulations adopted by the department. The department shall also adopt regulations to accomplish all of the following purposes:

(a) Maintain the integrity of approved Acala or Pima cotton and prevent contamination of those types of cotton.

(b) Require that applicants notify the department regarding the location of test sites and of the dates and procedures for planting, harvesting, and ginning of cotton.

(c) Establish a procedure for importing cottonseed into the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52902.

Before any nonapproved cotton is approved by the board for release and planting in the district, it shall be submitted to the board for production and quality evaluation and tests. The secretary, in consultation with the board and the University of California, shall adopt procedures for testing nonapproved cotton varieties. Variety tests shall be conducted for a minimum of three years prior to approval and release of the variety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52903.

The secretary, by permit, may allow seed cotton produced outside the district to be ginned within the district if the planting seed has met the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 52901. Cottonseed and lint resulting from these ginnings shall be disposed of as directed by the permit. Permittees may be charged an assessment not to exceed four dollars ($4) per bale to recover the department’s costs for permit enforcement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Exceptions [52911. - 52911.]

52911.

This chapter does not apply to the transportation of cottonseed through the district established by this chapter, from a point outside of the district to a destination outside of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 592.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Seed Distribution [52921. - 52923.]

52921.

All breeders seed for varieties developed by the United States Department of Agriculture or the University of California, and approved for release and planting by the board shall be allocated to the Foundation Seed and Seed Certification Service (FSSC) for expansion to foundation seed in cooperation with the board.FSSC shall distribute foundation seed to all qualified recipients. If there is not enough foundation seed available to satisfy all requests for foundation seed, FSSC may allocate the seed based upon any reasonable criteria, such as prior years acreage or allocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52922.

FSSC shall provide a method that will enable persons requesting foundation seed who have no history of cottonseed distribution to receive an initial allocation of foundation seed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52923.

FSSC shall develop criteria in consultation with the board for the allocation of foundation seed to qualified recipients. FSSC shall determine who is a qualified recipient and allocate foundation seed pursuant to that criteria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Referendum [52931. - 52938.]

52931.

A referendum of all cotton growers within the district shall be conducted if a petition, signed by not less than 5 percent of the cotton growers in the district, is submitted to the secretary, which calls for a referendum pertaining to the operation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 79.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52932.

This chapter shall remain operative if either of the following conditions is met:

(a) Not less than 65 percent of the cotton growers certified by the secretary who voted in the referendum, voted in favor of this chapter, and those cotton growers so voting represent at least a majority of the cotton producing acreage of all cotton growers who voted in the referendum.

(b) At least a majority of those cotton growers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter and those cotton growers so voting represent not less than 65 percent of the cotton producing acreage of all cotton growers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 80.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52933.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate such a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 592.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52934.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in Section 52932, he or she shall so certify and give notice of that favorable vote to the cotton growers in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52935.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in Section 52932, the secretary shall so certify and declare all provisions of this chapter inoperative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52936.

In addition to Section 52931, the board may hold a referendum whenever the board proposes changes to the Acala or Pima quality standard as provided in Section 52891.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52937.

A referendum shall be held if the board proposes to implement promotion and research funding as provided in Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 52951) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52938.

The board may call for a referendum at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 592.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Board and Enforcement Funding [52941. - 52945.]

52941.

(a) Any person who has cottonseed delinted for planting purposes under this chapter, shall annually pay to the secretary an assessment in an amount not to exceed six dollars ($6) per hundredweight on the undelinted weight of the cottonseed.

(b) Cottonseed delinters, by June 15th of each year, shall provide the secretary with the name and address of each person having cottonseed delinted and the undelinted weight of their cottonseed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 236, Sec. 1.   Effective August 11, 2003.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52942.

The assessment shall be used exclusively for enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, and the board functions including cotton variety testing and related administrative expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 592.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52943.

The secretary, after investigation and due notice, may fix the annual assessment provided under Section 52941 at a lesser amount that would provide sufficient funds to defray the board and enforcement costs incurred in administering this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52944.

The assessment shall be paid to the secretary within one calendar month after July 1 of each year, for cottonseed delinted in the preceding fiscal year or portion of a fiscal year beginning July 1, except that no assessment shall be paid by any person or organization for any cottonseed for which the assessment has been previously paid. If not paid within that period, a penalty of 10 percent of the assessment owed shall be due and payable to the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52945.

All moneys that are received by the secretary pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and shall be expended only for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Promotion and Research Funding [52951. - 52953.]

52951.

The board is authorized to annually assess cotton growers in the district in an amount not to exceed one-half of 1 percent of each grower’s gross dollar value from the previous year’s cotton crop.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52952.

Assessments collected under this article are subject to Section 52937 and Section 52932 and shall be used exclusively for promotion, research, and related administrative expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 592.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52953.

The board shall develop a procedure for collecting assessments under this article.

(a) Collection of the assessment may be required of cotton growers or cotton handlers.

(b) A penalty of 10 percent of the unpaid assessment fee due and payable may be imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Enforcement [52961. - 52961.]

52961.

The secretary, and the commissioner of each county acting under the secretary’s supervision, shall enforce this chapter and carry out its provisions and requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Violations and Penalties [52971. - 52976.]

52971.

It is unlawful for any person to violate the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 592.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52972.

Except as otherwise provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 52901), and Article 12 (commencing with Section 52981), in the district established by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to plant, possess for planting, pick, harvest, gin, or delint any cotton except those seeds or plants that are approved by the board for planting within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52973.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition thereto, is liable in a civil action for all damages that may be occasioned or caused by a violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 592.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52974.

Any seed cotton, cotton plant, or cottonseed that does not comply with this chapter is a public nuisance and is subject to seizure on complaint of the secretary or commissioner to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the seed cotton, cotton plant, or cottonseed is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52975.

The district attorney of the county in which any nuisance is found, at the request of the secretary or the commissioner, shall maintain, in the name of the people of the state, a civil action to abate and prevent the nuisance. Upon judgment and order of the court, that nuisance shall be condemned and destroyed in the manner directed by the court, denatured, or otherwise processed, or released upon conditions that the court may impose to ensure that the nuisance will be abated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52976.

If the owner fails to comply with the order of the court within the time that is specified in the order, the court shall order the secretary, commissioner, sheriff, or marshal to dispose of the seed cotton, cotton plant, or cottonseed and containers, under those terms and conditions as the court may describe.

If the court orders the sale of any of the seed cotton, cotton plants, or cottonseed and containers that can be salvaged, the costs of disposal shall be deducted from the proceeds of sale and the balance shall be paid into court for the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Growing of Nonapproved Varieties [52981. - 52982.]

52981.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, nonapproved varieties of cotton may be grown in the district, subject to regulations proposed by the board and adopted by the department.

(b) The department shall adopt regulations that ensure that the growing of nonapproved varieties of cotton do not adversely affect the quality of Acala and Pima cotton approved to be grown in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 708, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

52982.

Article 9 (commencing with Section 52941), Article 10 (commencing with Section 52961), and Article 11 (commencing with Section 52971) apply to this article, except that the secretary may increase the assessment specified in Article 9 (commencing with Section 52941) in the amount necessary to enforce the regulations adopted by the department for nonapproved varieties of cotton grown in the district pursuant to this article, in order to ensure the quality of Acala and Pima cotton grown in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 708, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Operation [52991. - 52993.]

52991.

(a) Except as specified in Section 52992, on and after January 1, 2014, the provisions of this chapter, and any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, shall become inoperative unless either of the following occurs: 

(1) A resolution is approved in accordance with the procedures specified in subdivision (c) of Section 52891.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013, to continue the operation of this chapter.

(2) The secretary receives a petition from members of the cotton industry in the San Joaquin Valley and makes a determination that circumstances in the California cotton industry indicate that the operation of specified
 sections of this chapter is in the best interests of the cotton industry and the state. If the secretary makes that determination, the secretary may establish a committee to advise the secretary. The committee shall be comprised of cotton growers, handlers of whole cottonseed, handlers of raw cotton fiber, and representatives of cotton ginning organizations.

(b) If the provisions of this chapter become operative as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), the department shall post this fact on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 383, Sec. 2.   (AB 1389)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

52992.

The following sections of this chapter shall remain operative and shall be administered by the secretary:

(a) Section 52893 as it relates to certified cottonseed.

(b) Section 52901 as it relates to certified cottonseed and colored cotton.

(c) Section 52981 as it relates to colored cotton.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 383, Sec. 2.   (AB 1389)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

52993.

The secretary shall not be required to administer this article or any provisions of this chapter that are operative pursuant to Sections 52991 and 52992 unless the secretary determines that there are sufficient funds remaining in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund that were deposited and authorized to be expended for the purposes of this chapter, or from other sources, including the California cotton industry, to pay the costs incurred by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 383, Sec. 2.   (AB 1389)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Nursery Stock Grades and Standards [53301. - 53564.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [53301. - 53313.]

53301.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53302.

“Advertisement” means any representation which relates to nursery stock, that is disseminated in any manner or by any means, except a representation which is on the label.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53303.

“Decorative plants” means indoor plants which are commonly grown and sold in movable containers, and which are not adapted for cultivation out of doors because of climatic conditions and natural peculiarities of habit or growth and because of the purpose of their cultivation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53304.

“Grade size” means the designation relating to nursery stock which denotes the height, spread, caliper, dimension, condition, quality, age, methods of propagation, or means of growth.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53305.

“Labeling” means all labels, and other written, printed, or graphic representations, in any form whatsoever, which accompanies and pertains to any nursery stock.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53306.

“Nursery stock” means all kinds of nursery stock except decorative plants and seeds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53307.

“Ornamental” means any plant which is grown for ornamental purposes, except decorative plants, dormant bulbs, tubers, roots, corms, rhizomes, and pips.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53308.

“Botanical name” means the genus and species, the genus, species, and cultivar name, or the genus and cultivar name given to a plant in accordance with the International Code of Botanical Nomenclature and the International Code of Nomenclature of Cultivated Plants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

53309.

“Cultivar name” means the cultivated variety name given to a plant in accordance with the International Code of Nomenclature of Cultivated Plants, without regard to whether that plant is selected from a wild or cultivated population or produced through hybridization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 622, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

53310.

“Blend” means a combination of the same kinds of nursery stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 622, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

53311.

“Mixture” means a combination of two or more kinds of nursery stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 622, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

53312.

“Sod” means grassy surface soil nursery stock held together by matted roots of the grass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 622, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

53313.

“Turf” means grassy surface soil nursery stock consisting of grass cultivars, mixtures or blends of grass cultivars, and dichondra for use in residential and commercial landscapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 622, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [53331. - 53332.]

53331.

The Legislature hereby declares that by making any additions to or amendments of this chapter it intends to formulate a system of grades and standards and minimum requirements for nursery stock to the end that purchasers of nursery stock may have adequate knowledge concerning the name and the grade size of nursery stock with relation to established standards. If, however, any provisions of, or amendment or addition to, this chapter, either as originally enacted or as amended or added to, should be held to be unconstitutional, the unconstitutionality of such provision shall not affect any other provision of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53332.

The Legislature hereby declares that it would have enacted each section, subdivision, sentence, clause, or phrase of this chapter irrespective of the fact that one or more other sections, subdivisions, sentences, clauses, or phrases be declared unconstitutional.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Enforcement [53361. - 53363.]

53361.

The director and the commissioners of each county of the state, their deputies and inspectors, under the supervision and control of the director, shall enforce this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53362.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, all enforcing officers may enter upon any public or private premises in order to have access to nursery stock subject to this chapter and the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53363.

If the director or the commissioner shall find that any person has violated any provision of this chapter, he may institute proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the violation occurred, to have such person convicted of the violation, or he may file with the district attorney such evidence that may be deemed necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Regulations [53391. - 53392.]

53391.

The director may adopt regulations which may be necessary to carry into effect the purposes of this chapter and each section of it, and may issue in relation to this chapter explanatory data and charts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53392.

The director by regulations may provide for grade sizes of the different kinds of nursery stock, and may provide that nursery stock shall be labeled with grade sizes which are established by such regulations. The director may make such other regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Warning Tags or Notices [53421. - 53425.]

53421.

The director or the commissioner may issue and enforce a written or printed warning tag or notice to the owner or custodian of any lot of nursery stock which he finds is in violation of any provision of this chapter, which shall prohibit movement of such nursery stock until such officer has evidence that the law has been complied with. Upon compliance such order shall be removed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53422.

It is unlawful for any person to move or otherwise dispose of any lot of nursery stock which is held under a warning tag or notice except with the permission of the director or the commissioner and for the purpose specified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53423.
